Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 1. General Provisions.

§ 24.2-200.
When terms to begin.

The terms of all officers chosen at a November general election shall begin on the January 1 succeeding their election unless otherwise provided in this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the terms of all officers elected at a May general election shall begin on the July 1 succeeding their election. They shall continue to discharge the duties of their respective offices until their successors qualify.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 24-142, 24-169; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-73; 1993, c. 641.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

13B M.J. Municipal Corporations, § 69.

§ 24.2-201.
When term of officer elected to fill vacancy commences and expires.

The term of office of any person chosen at a special election to fill a vacancy in any public office shall commence as soon as he shall qualify and give bond, if bond is required, and shall continue for the unexpired term of such office.
Any person so elected shall qualify and give bond, if bond is required, no later than thirty days following the date on which the special election was held.

History.

Code 1950, § 24-144; 1970, c. 462, § 24.1-75; 1982, c. 146; 1993, c. 641.